Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2228.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Judicial Enforceability of Nondisclosure Contracts Involving Sexual Assault Act.Section 2. Declaration of purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Sexual harassment and sexual assault remain pervasive in the workplace and throughout civic society, affecting millions of Americans.(2) Eighty-one percent of women and 43% of men have experienced some form of sexual harassment or sexual assault throughout their lifetime.(3) One in three women have faced sexual harassment in the workplace during their career, and an estimated 87% to 12345678910111213141516171819 94% of individuals who experience sexual harassment never file a formal complaint.(4) Sexual harassment in the workplace forces many women to leave their occupation or industry or pass up opportunities for advancement.(5) In order to combat sexual harassment and sexual assault, it is essential that victims and survivors have the freedom to report and publicly disclose their abuse.(6) Nondisclosure and nondisparagement provisions in agreements between employers and current, former and prospective employees and independent contractors and between providers of goods and services and consumers, can perpetuate illegal conduct by silencing those who are survivors of illegal sexual harassment and sexual assault or illegal retaliation, or have knowledge of such conduct, while shielding perpetrators and enabling them to continue their abuse.(7) Prohibiting nondisclosure and nondisparagement clauses will empower survivors to come forward, hold perpetrators accountable for abuse, improve transparency around illegal conduct, enable the pursuit of justice and make workplaces safer and more productive for everyone.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Nondisclosure clause." A provision in a contract or agreement that requires the parties to the contract or agreement not to disclose or discuss conduct, the existence of a settlement involving conduct or information covered by the terms 20260HB2228PN2921 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and conditions of the contract or agreement."Nondisparagement clause." A provision in a contract or agreement that requires one or more parties to the contract or agreement not to make a negative statement about another party that relates to the contract, agreement, claim or case."Sexual assault dispute." A dispute involving an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 31 (relating to sexual offenses), including when the victim lacks the capacity to consent."Sexual harassment." Unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favors and other conduct of a sexual nature."Sexual harassment dispute." A dispute relating to conduct that is alleged to constitute sexual harassment.Section 4. Limitation on judicial enforceability of nondisclosure and nondisparagement contract clauses regarding sexual assault or sexual harassment.(a) Unenforceable clauses.--With respect to a sexual assault dispute or sexual harassment dispute, a nondisclosure clause or nondisparagement clause agreed to before the dispute arises shall not be judicially enforceable in the courts of this Commonwealth in instances in which conduct is alleged to have violated State law.(b) Right to speak freely.--Nothing in this act shall prohibit the Commonwealth or a municipality from enforcing a provision of State law governing nondisclosure clauses or nondisparagement clauses that is at least as protective of the right of an individual to speak freely as provided by this act.(c) Pseudonyms.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to supersede a provision of Federal or State law that governs the use of pseudonyms in the filing of claims involving sexual assault disputes or sexual harassment disputes.20260HB2228PN2921 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Protection of trade secrets or proprietary information.--Nothing in this act shall prohibit an employer and an employee from protecting trade secrets or proprietary information.Section 5. Applicability.This act shall apply with respect to a claim that is filed in a court of competent jurisdiction under State law on or after the effective date of this section.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2228PN2921 - 4 - 12345678910